District of Columbia statutes.
10-1181.05

Assessment of fee.

The Director may charge any person whose property abuts the unsafe private structure that is the subject of any corrective action as provided in this chapter or any property owner who receives a notice to correct any wrongful condition, a fee to cover the administrative costs incurred by the District in its effort to remedy the violation. The Director may assess this fee as a tax against the property, may carry this tax on the regular tax rolls, and may collect this tax in the same manner as real estate taxes are collected.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 6026, 51 DCR 8441
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6026 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6026 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).